Hawaii, session 2025, HB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- High school law enforcement career-pipeline initiative.  (a)  There shall be created in the department a high school law enforcement curriculum-to-career-pipeline initiative. (b)  The purpose of the high school law enforcement curriculum-to-career-pipeline initiative shall be to enable students to pursue training and qualified experiences, as approved by a school's administration, pertaining to the field of law enforcement and accrue credits to complete graduation requirements. (c)  The department shall collaborate and consult with the department of law enforcement and the local police departments of the respective counties to develop and implement the high school law enforcement curriculum-to-career-pipeline initiative. (d)  The department shall adopt and implement specific training and education programs for careers in law enforcement.  In adopting such programs, the department shall build a curriculum track to facilitate transition into post-secondary education at the police academy of each respective county, the University of Hawaii, and the University of Hawaii Community Colleges. (e)  The department shall offer the following to satisfy high school graduation requirements: (1)  An elective offering training and mentorship opportunities with community police officers, similar to Honolulu Police Department's Law Enforcement Explorers Program; (2)  An age-appropriate version of the Honolulu Police Department's Citizens Police Academy; (3)  A course that allows students to assist school resource officers, if one is assigned to their high school, in tasks relating to implementing school programs, administering informational sessions, and promoting school safety; and (4)  A dual credit program in accordance with section 302A-401 with the University of Hawaii and the University of Hawaii Community Colleges for courses in fields relating to criminal justice, justice administration, and criminology. (f)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of developing and implementing a high school law enforcement curriculum-to-career pipeline initiative. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________